North Carolina, session 2025, HB540.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of two million dollars
($2,000,000) in recurring funds to be allocated to the Patriot Foundation for the operation of the
North Carolina Patriot Star Family Scholarship Program.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H540-v-1*